District of Columbia statutes.
47-2323

Assessments for street paving — Generally.

Assessments in accordance with existing law shall be made for paving and repaving roadways, where such roadways are paved or repaved, with funds derived from the collection of the tax on motor vehicle fuels.

Mar. 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 167, ch. 44, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2323.
1973 Ed., § 47-1917.